Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 13. Fees.

§79-14-1301.
Fees.

Pursuant to this chapter, the Secretary of State shall charge and collect a fee for:

Reservation, Cancellation or Transfer of PartnershipName. . . . . $25.00

Filing of Certificate of Limited Partnership. . . . .50.00

Filing of Amendment to Certificate of LimitedPartnership. . . . .50.00

Filing of Statement of Dissolution. . . . .25.00

[Reserved]

Filing of Restated Certificate of Limited Partnershipor Amended and Restated Certificate of LimitedPartnership. . . . .25.00

Filing of Statement of Withdrawal. . . . .25.00

Filing of Application for Registration of Foreign LimitedPartnership. . . . .250.00

Filing of Certificate Correcting Application orRegistration of Foreign Limited Partnership. . . . .50.00

Filing of withdrawal of Registration of ForeignLimited Partnership. . . . .25.00

Certificate of Administrative Dissolution. . . . .No fee

Filing of Application for Reinstatement FollowingAdministrative Dissolution. . . . .50.00

Certificate of Revocation of Registration to TransactBusiness. . . . .No fee

Filing of Application for Reinstatement FollowingAdministrative Revocation. . . . .100.00

Any other document required or permitted to befiled by Section 79-14-101 et seq. . . . .25.00

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.